Hawaii statutes.
§342P-28 Fees. The director may
establish reasonable fees for the issuance of notifications, certificates,
licenses, permits, and variances to cover the cost of issuance thereof, and for
the implementation and enforcement of the terms and conditions of permits and
variances not including court costs or other costs associated with any formal
enforcement action. The fees shall be deposited to the credit of the asbestos
and lead abatement special fund or noise, radiation, and indoor air quality
special fund. [L 1991, c 219, pt of §1; am L 1998, c 242, §13 and c 311, §20;
am L 1999, c 18, §7]

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in
this section.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next